West Virginia, session 2026, SB297.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Racing Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-23-6 of this code, modified by the Racing Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 5, 2025, relating to the Racing Commission (thoroughbred racing, 178 CSR 01), is authorized.